Illinois, session 104th, HB4701.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Limitations on Facility Fees Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Campus" means: (i) a hospital's main buildings; (ii) the 8physical area immediately adjacent to a hospital's main 9buildings and other areas and structures that are not strictly 10contiguous to the main buildings but are located within 250 11yards of the main buildings; or (iii) any other area that has 12been determined on an individual case basis by the Centers for 13Medicare and Medicaid Services to be part of a hospital's 14campus.15    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.16    "Facility fee" means any fee charged or billed by a health 17care provider for outpatient services provided in a 18hospital-based facility or freestanding emergency center that 19is: (i) intended to compensate the health care provider for 20the operational expenses of the health care provider; (ii) 21separate and distinct from a professional fee; and (iii) 22regardless of the modality through which the health care 23services were provided.  HB4701- 2 -LRB104 17497 BAB 30923 b1    "Freestanding emergency center" means a freestanding 2emergency center licensed under Section 32.5 of the Emergency 3Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act. "Freestanding emergency 4center" does not include an urgent care clinic.5    "Health care provider" means an individual, entity, 6corporation, person, or organization, whether for profit or 7nonprofit, that furnishes, bills, or is paid for health care 8service delivery in the normal course of business, and 9includes, without limitation, health systems, hospitals, 10hospital-based facilities, freestanding emergency centers, and 11urgent care clinics.12    "Health system" means: (i) a parent corporation of one or 13more hospitals and any entity affiliated with the parent 14corporation through ownership, governance, membership, or 15other means, or (ii) a hospital and any entity affiliated with 16the hospital through ownership, governance, membership, or 17other means. 18    "Hospital" means a hospital licensed under the Hospital 19Licensing Act.20    "Hospital-based facility" means a facility that is owned 21or operated, in whole or in part, by a hospital where hospital 22or professional medical services are provided.23    "Professional fee" means any fee charged or billed by a 24provider for professional medical services provided in a 25hospital-based facility.   HB4701- 3 -LRB104 17497 BAB 30923 b1    Section 10. Limits on facility fees.2    (a) Site-specific limits. No health care provider shall 3charge, bill, or collect a facility fee, except for: (i) 4services provided on a hospital's campus; (ii) services 5provided at a facility that includes a licensed hospital 6emergency department; or (iii) emergency services provided at 7a freestanding emergency center.8    (b) Service-specific limits. Notwithstanding subsection 9(a) and whether or not the services are provided on a 10hospital's campus, no health care provider shall charge, bill, 11or collect a facility fee for: (i) outpatient evaluation and 12management services; or (ii) any other outpatient, diagnostic, 13or imaging services identified by the Department pursuant to 14subsection (c).15    (c) Identification of services. The Department shall 16annually identify services subject to the limitations on 17facility fees provided in subsection (b) that may reliably be 18provided safely and effectively in settings other than 19hospitals. 20    Section 15. Reporting.21    (a) Each hospital, health system, and freestanding 22emergency center shall submit a report annually to the 23Department concerning facility fees charged or billed during 24the preceding calendar year. The Department shall publish the 25information reported on a publicly accessible website   HB4701- 4 -LRB104 17497 BAB 30923 b1designated by the Department.2    (b) The report shall include, without limitation, the 3following information:4        (1) the name and full address of each facility owned 5    or operated by the hospital, health system, or 6    freestanding emergency center that provides services for 7    which a facility fee is charged or billed;8        (2) the number of patient visits at each 9    hospital-based facility or freestanding emergency center 10    for which a facility fee was charged or billed;11        (3) the number, total amount, and range of allowable 12    facility fees paid at each facility by Medicare, Medicaid, 13    and private insurance;14        (4) for each hospital-based facility, and for the 15    hospital or health system as a whole or freestanding 16    emergency center, the total amount billed and the total 17    revenue received from facility fees;18        (5) the top 10 procedures or services, identified by 19    current procedural terminology (CPT) category I codes, 20    provided by the hospital, health system, or freestanding 21    emergency center overall that generated the greatest 22    amount of facility fee gross revenue, the volume each of 23    these 10 procedures or services and gross and net revenue 24    totals, for each of the procedures or services, and, for 25    each of the procedures or services, the total net amount 26    of revenue received by the hospital, health system, or   HB4701- 5 -LRB104 17497 BAB 30923 b1    freestanding emergency center derived from facility fees;2        (6) the top 10 procedures or services, identified by 3    current procedural terminology (CPT) category I codes, 4    based on patient volume, provided by the hospital, health 5    system, or freestanding emergency center overall for which 6    facility fees are billed or charged based on patient 7    volume, including the gross and net revenue totals 8    received for each such procedure or service; and9        (7) any other information related to facility fees 10    that the Department may require.11    (c) Until the expiration of 4 years after the furnishing 12of any services for which a facility fee was charged, billed, 13or collected, each health care provider shall make available, 14upon written request by the Department or its designee, copies 15of any books, documents, records, or data that are necessary 16for the purposes of completing the audit. 17    Section 20. Rulemaking. The Department may adopt rules 18necessary to implement the provisions of this Act, specify the 19format and content of reports, and impose penalties for 20noncompliance consistent with the Department's authority to 21regulate health care providers. 22    Section 25. Enforcement.23    (a) Any violation of this Act shall be considered an 24unlawful practice within the meaning of the Consumer Fraud and   HB4701- 6 -LRB104 17497 BAB 30923 b1Deceptive Business Practices Act.2    (b) A health care provider that violates this Act or the 3rules adopted pursuant to this Act shall be subject to an 4administrative penalty of not more than $1,000 per occurrence.5    (c) The Department or its designee may audit any health 6care provider for compliance with the requirements of this 7Act. 8    Section 30. The Fair Patient Billing Act is amended by 9changing Section 12 as follows: 10    (210 ILCS 88/12)11    Sec. 12. Facility fee disclosure. Notwithstanding the 12provisions set forth in the Limitations on Facility Fees Act, 13if If a hospital charges a facility fee for outpatient 14services separate and distinct from a professional fee, then 15the hospital shall develop a policy to inform patients as soon 16as reasonably practicable that they may be subject to a 17facility fee. The policy shall include, but not be limited to, 18the method the facility will use to inform patients that they 19may be charged a facility fee; the services and operating 20expenses generally covered by facility fees; the reason for 21charging a facility fee on the patient or patient's health 22plan; and contact information to allow the patient to request 23more information.24(Source: P.A. 104-181, eff. 1-1-26.)   HB4701- 7 -LRB104 17497 BAB 30923 b1    Section 35. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 2Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 3    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)4    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Limitations on Facility Fees 5Act. Any person who violates the Limitations on Facility Fees 6Act commits an unlawful practice within the meaning of this 7Act.